Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201386-209
Violations;
penalties; appeal.

(1) Notwithstanding section
75-156, the commission may, after hearing, impose an administrative penalty
for a violation of the Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention Act. The penalty
for a violation shall not exceed two thousand dollars. Every violation associated
with a specific access line within the state shall be considered a separate
and distinct violation.

(2) The amount of an administrative penalty shall be based
on:

(a) The nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of a prohibited
act;

(b) The history of previous violations;

(c) The amount necessary to deter future violations; and

(d) Any efforts to correct the violation.

(3) The commission shall remit any administrative penalty
collected under this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance
with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

(4) Any administrative penalty may be appealed. The appeal
shall be in accordance with section
75-136.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 1285, § 24;

Laws 2001, LB 389, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-1909;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 71;

Laws 2008, LB755, § 7;

Laws 2013, LB545, § 12.
September 6, 2013
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.